Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-613
Oaths; depositions; subpoenas.

In the discharge of the duties imposed by the Employment Security Law, the Commissioner of Labor, an impartial hearing officer employed by the Department of Labor, and any duly authorized representative of any of them shall have power to administer oaths and affirmations, take depositions, certify to official acts, and issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, and other records deemed necessary as evidence in connection with a disputed claim or the administration of such law.

Laws 1937, c. 108, § 11, p. 393;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-711;

R.S.1943, § 48-613;

Laws 1985, LB 339, § 12;

Laws 2001, LB 192, § 6;

Laws 2017, LB172, § 13.